Tennessee, session 114, SB2724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 402 of the Acts of 1901, as amended and rewritten by Chapter
131 of the Private Acts of 2004, Chapter 119 of the Private Acts of 2006, Chapter 36 of the
Private Acts of 2007, Chapter 12 of the Private Acts of 2023, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting SECTION 10 and substituting:
SECTION 10. The Mayor shall be the chief executive officer of the City and shall
have supervision of all City affairs; require such reports from the officers and employees
of the City as he or she may reasonably deem necessary to carry out his or her
executive responsibilities; preside at all meetings of the Board, unless absent, in which
event the Vice-Mayor shall preside; be responsible for the execution of the laws or
ordinances of the City and have such other authority and perform such other duties as
the Board may from time to time prescribe; execute all contracts as authorized by the
Board; communicate information needed, and recommend measures to the Board to
expedite the business of the City; call special meetings of the Board upon adequate
notice to the Board and public; state the matters to be considered at the special
meetings and the action of the Board shall be limited to those matters submitted; make
appointments to boards and commissions as authorized by law; submit the annual
budgets of the City to the Board for their adoption by ordinance; and perform such other
duties as may be designated or required by the Board.
SB2724
014646
- 1 -

The Mayor may suspend an employee for misconduct or dereliction of duty as a
means of reprimand. An employee may appeal a suspension to the Board. The
decision of the Board shall be final.
The office of Mayor shall be a full-time position, and the Board may from time to
time by ordinance establish certain functions and duties of this office that shall not be
inconsistent with this charter.
The Mayor shall serve as a member of all boards and committees created by the
Board. The Mayor shall have a voice, but shall only vote in the event of a tie, then he or
she shall cast the vote breaking the tie at meetings of the Board and at any board or
committee meeting created by the Board.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Lexington. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
- 2 - 014646